District of Columbia statutes.
4-202.03

Mayor authorized to delegate functions.

The Mayor may delegate and subdelegate any function vested in him or her by this chapter to any agency, officer, or employee of the District. The Mayor may contract with private entities to carry out functions under the TANF or POWER programs vested in him or her by this chapter, subject to the limitation of § 4-205.19h and any other applicable District law.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 203, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(d), 46 DCR 905
Mayor’s reports: Section 4 of Law 7-86 provided that within 180 days of March 11, 1988, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council a written report describing specific plans and timetables for implementing the provisions of this act. The Mayor shall transmit to the Council an annual updated written report regarding the status of the Emergency Shelter Family Program.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-124, see Mayor’s Order 86-220, December 23, 1986.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-35, see Mayor’s Order 86-40, March 13, 1986.
Amendment of Mayor’s Order 86-26 dated February 6, 1986, Delegation of Authority under the Public Assistance Act of 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, see Mayor’s Orders 93-31, March 23, 1993; 93-219, December 1, 1993.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(d) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(d) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(d) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
1981 Ed., § 3-202.3.